Utah statutes.
70A-3-201.   Negotiation.
(1)  "Negotiation" means a transfer of possession, whether voluntary or
involuntary, of an instrument by a person other than the issuer to a person
who thereby becomes its holder.
(2)  Except for negotiation by a remitter, if an instrument is payable to an
identified person, negotiation requires transfer of possession of the
instrument and its indorsement by the holder. If an instrument is payable to
bearer, it may be negotiated by transfer of possession alone.
